src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.aff
FLAG long
SFX Vm erir irieran/G1 [^a]ferir
SFX Vm erir iriéran/XxV1V2V3V4 [^a]ferir
SFX Vm erir irieren/G1 [^a]ferir
SFX Vm erir iriéren/XxV1V2V3V4 [^a]ferir
SFX Vm ir ieran/G0 aferir
SFX Vm ir iéran/XxV7V8 aferir
SFX Vm ir ieren/G0 aferir
SFX Vm ir iéren/XxV7V8 aferir

SFX Vn Y 211
SFX Vn er í/G0 er
SFX Vn er í'l/G0 er
SFX Vn er í/XxV3V4 er
SFX Vn er isti/G0 er
SFX Vn er isti'l/G0 er
SFX Vn er ísti/XxV7V8 er
SFX Vn er iesti/G0 [^xlhyñ]er
SFX Vn er iesti'l/G0 [^xlhyñ]er
SFX Vn er iesti/G0 [^c]her
SFX Vn er iesti'l/G0 [^c]her
SFX Vn er iesti/G0 [^l]ler
SFX Vn er iesti'l/G0 [^l]ler
SFX Vn er esti/G0 cher
SFX Vn er esti'l/G0 cher
SFX Vn er esti/G0 ller
SFX Vn er esti'l/G0 ller
SFX Vn er esti/G0 [ñxy]er
SFX Vn er esti'l/G0 [ñxy]er
SFX Vn er iésti/XxV7V8 [^xlhyñ]er
SFX Vn er iésti/XxV7V8 [^c]her
SFX Vn er iésti/XxV7V8 [^l]ler
SFX Vn er ésti/XxV7V8 cher
SFX Vn er ésti/XxV7V8 ller
SFX Vn er ésti/XxV7V8 [ñxy]er
SFX Vn er imos/G2 er
SFX Vn er ímos/XxV5V6 er
SFX Vn er iemos/G2 [^xlhyñ]er
SFX Vn er iemos/G2 [^c]her
SFX Vn er iemos/G2 [^l]ler
SFX Vn er emos/G2 cher
SFX Vn er emos/G2 ller
SFX Vn er emos/G2 [ñxy]er
SFX Vn er iémos/XxV5V6 [^xlhyñ]er
SFX Vn er iémos/XxV5V6 [^c]her
SFX Vn er iémos/XxV5V6 [^l]ler
SFX Vn er émos/XxV5V6 cher
SFX Vn er émos/XxV5V6 ller
SFX Vn er émos/XxV5V6 [ñxy]er
SFX Vn er istis/G3 er
SFX Vn er ístis/XxV9V0 er
SFX Vn er iestis/G3 [^xlhyñ]er
SFX Vn er iestis/G3 [^c]her
SFX Vn er iestis/G3 [^l]ler
SFX Vn er estis/G3 cher
SFX Vn er estis/G3 ller
SFX Vn er estis/G3 [ñxy]er
SFX Vn er iéstis/XxV9V0 [^xlhyñ]er
SFX Vn er iéstis/XxV9V0 [^c]her
SFX Vn er iéstis/XxV9V0 [^l]ler
SFX Vn er éstis/XxV9V0 cher
SFX Vn er éstis/XxV9V0 ller
SFX Vn er éstis/XxV9V0 [ñxy]er
SFX Vn ir í/G0 ir
SFX Vn ir í'l/G0 ir
SFX Vn ir í/XxV3V4 ir
SFX Vn ir isti/G0 ir
SFX Vn ir ísti/XxV7V8 ir
SFX Vn ir iesti/G0 [^xlhyñ]ir
SFX Vn ir iesti'l/G0 [^xlhyñ]ir
SFX Vn ir iesti/G0 [^c]hir
SFX Vn ir iesti'l/G0 [^c]hir
SFX Vn ir iesti/G0 [^l]lir
SFX Vn ir iesti'l/G0 [^l]lir
SFX Vn ir esti/G0 chir
SFX Vn ir esti'l/G0 chir
SFX Vn ir esti/G0 llir
SFX Vn ir esti'l/G0 llir
SFX Vn ir esti/G0 [ñxy]ir
SFX Vn ir esti'l/G0 [ñxy]ir
SFX Vn ir iésti/XxV7V8 [^xlhyñ]ir
SFX Vn ir iésti/XxV7V8 [^c]hir
SFX Vn ir iésti/XxV7V8 [^l]lir
SFX Vn ir ésti/XxV7V8 chir
SFX Vn ir ésti/XxV7V8 llir
SFX Vn ir ésti/XxV7V8 [ñxy]ir
SFX Vn ir imos/G2 ir
SFX Vn ir ímos/XxV5V6 ir
SFX Vn ir iemos/G2 [^xlhyñ]ir
SFX Vn ir iemos/G2 [^c]hir
SFX Vn ir iemos/G2 [^l]lir
SFX Vn ir emos/G2 chir
SFX Vn ir emos/G2 llir
SFX Vn ir emos/G2 [ñxy]ir
SFX Vn ir iémos/XxV5V6 [^xlhyñ]ir
SFX Vn ir iémos/XxV5V6 [^c]hir
SFX Vn ir iémos/XxV5V6 [^l]lir
SFX Vn ir émos/XxV5V6 chir
SFX Vn ir émos/XxV5V6 llir
SFX Vn ir émos/XxV5V6 [ñxy]ir
SFX Vn ir istis/G3 ir
SFX Vn ir ístis/XxV9V0 ir
SFX Vn ir iestis/G3 [^xlhyñ]ir
SFX Vn ir iestis/G3 [^c]hir
SFX Vn ir iestis/G3 [^l]lir
SFX Vn ir estis/G3 chir
SFX Vn ir estis/G3 llir
SFX Vn ir estis/G3 [ñxy]ir
SFX Vn ir iéstis/XxV9V0 [^xlhyñ]ir
SFX Vn ir iéstis/XxV9V0 [^c]hir
SFX Vn ir iéstis/XxV9V0 [^l]lir
SFX Vn ir éstis/XxV9V0 chir
SFX Vn ir éstis/XxV9V0 llir
SFX Vn ir éstis/XxV9V0 [ñxy]ir
SFX Vn entir intió/G1 entir
SFX Vn entir intió'l/G1 entir
SFX Vn entir intió/XxV1V2 entir
SFX Vn entir intieron/G1 entir
SFX Vn entir intiéron/XxV1V2 entir
SFX Vn entir intiera/G1 entir
SFX Vn entir intiera'l/G1 entir
SFX Vn entir intiéra/XxV1V2 entir
SFX Vn entir intieras/G0 entir
SFX Vn entir intiéras/XxV7V8 entir
SFX Vn entir intiéramos/G2 entir
SFX Vn entir intiéramos/XxV5V6 entir
SFX Vn entir intierais/G3 entir
SFX Vn entir intiérais/XxV9V0 entir
SFX Vn entir intieran/G1 entir
SFX Vn entir intiéran/XxV1V2 entir
SFX Vn entir intiere/G1 entir
SFX Vn entir intiere'l/G1 entir
SFX Vn entir intiére/XxV1V2 entir
SFX Vn entir intieres/G0 entir
SFX Vn entir intiéres/XxV7V8 entir
SFX Vn entir intiéremos/G2 entir
SFX Vn entir intiéremos/XxV5V6 entir
SFX Vn entir intiereis/G3 entir
SFX Vn entir intiéreis/XxV9V0 entir
SFX Vn entir intieren/G1 entir
SFX Vn entir intiéren/XxV1V2 entir
SFX Vn etir itió/G1 etir
SFX Vn etir itió'l/G1 etir
SFX Vn etir itió/XxV1V2 etir
SFX Vn etir itieron/G1 etir
SFX Vn etir itiéron/XxV1V2 etir
SFX Vn etir itiera/G1 etir
SFX Vn etir itiera'l/G1 etir
SFX Vn etir itiéra/XxV1V2 etir
SFX Vn etir itieras/G0 etir
SFX Vn etir itiéras/XxV7V8 etir
SFX Vn etir itiéramos/G2 etir
SFX Vn etir itiéramos/XxV5V6 etir
SFX Vn etir itierais/G3 etir
SFX Vn etir itiérais/XxV9V0 etir
SFX Vn etir itieran/G1 etir
SFX Vn etir itiéran/XxV1V2 etir
SFX Vn etir itiere/G1 etir
SFX Vn etir itiere'l/G1 etir
SFX Vn etir itiére/XxV1V2 etir
SFX Vn etir itieres/G0 etir
SFX Vn etir itiéres/XxV7V8 etir
SFX Vn etir itiéremos/G2 etir
SFX Vn etir itiéremos/XxV5V6 etir
SFX Vn etir itiereis/G3 etir
SFX Vn etir itiéreis/XxV9V0 etir
SFX Vn etir itieren/G1 etir
SFX Vn etir itiéren/XxV1V2 etir
SFX Vn exir ixó/G1 exir
SFX Vn exir ixó'l/G1 exir
SFX Vn exir ixó/XxV1V2 exir
SFX Vn exir ixeron/G1 exir
SFX Vn exir ixéron/XxV1V2 exir
SFX Vn exir ixera/G1 exir
SFX Vn exir ixera'l/G1 exir
SFX Vn exir ixéra/XxV1V2 exir
SFX Vn exir ixeras/G0 exir
SFX Vn exir ixéras/XxV7V8 exir
SFX Vn exir ixéramos/G2 exir
SFX Vn exir ixéramos/XxV5V6 exir
SFX Vn exir ixerais/G3 exir
SFX Vn exir ixérais/XxV9V0 exir
SFX Vn exir ixeran/G1 exir
SFX Vn exir ixéran/XxV1V2 exir
SFX Vn exir ixere/G1 exir
SFX Vn exir ixere'l/G1 exir
SFX Vn exir ixére/XxV1V2 exir
SFX Vn exir ixeres/G0 exir
SFX Vn exir ixéres/XxV7V8 exir
SFX Vn exir ixéremos/G2 exir
SFX Vn exir ixéremos/XxV5V6 exir
SFX Vn exir ixereis/G3 exir
SFX Vn exir ixéreis/XxV9V0 exir
SFX Vn exir ixeren/G1 exir
SFX Vn exir ixéren/XxV1V2 exir
SFX Vn ormir urmió/G1 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmió'l/G1 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmió/XxV1V2 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmieron/G1 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiéron/XxV1V2 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiera/G1 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiera'l/G1 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiéra/XxV1V2 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmieras/G0 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiéras/XxV7V8 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiéramos/G2 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiéramos/XxV5V6 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmierais/G3 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiérais/XxV9V0 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmieran/G1 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiéran/XxV1V2 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiere/G1 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiere'l/G1 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiére/XxV1V2 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmieres/G0 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiéres/XxV7V8 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiéremos/G2 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiéremos/XxV5V6 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiereis/G3 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiéreis/XxV9V0 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmieren/G1 ormir
SFX Vn ormir urmiéren/XxV1V2 ormir
