src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.dic
abaunar/VtVdVvVhVjVkVmVr
abobizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
abrochar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acalar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acarrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aceruyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aclamar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acongoxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acotollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acurruxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
adormir/VtVbVfViVjVkVnVrVt
aducir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aferreguñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afondar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afusar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aglayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aguixonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
albañilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aliar/VtVuVwVhVjVkVmVr
allindiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alotiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amalinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amatadurar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amesonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amoricar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ampariar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aneblar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
anteceder/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apalpuñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apastranar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apellistrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apiancar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apiñotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aporfiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aprimir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arbeyar/VtSmGaYsVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrabañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrasiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arredolar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrenunciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arringlar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arruinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asentir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVnVrVt
asesorar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asorar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atambar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atempar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atixerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atortollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atristayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aurricar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
averriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
axobear/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
azorollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
añoñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
baraxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
batoretiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
bitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
bozar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
buyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
calambranar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
calumniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
capiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
carpinteriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
caviar/VtSmYsVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cepillar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chapuzar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chisgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cierzar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
clamar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
coldiciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
compangar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
competir/VtVcVgViVjVkVnVrVt
condescender/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
construyir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cooperar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
correxir/VtVcVgViVjVkVnVrVt
cotizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cuartar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cuspiñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
decretar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
depeñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desabrigar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desafianzar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desalliñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desapartar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desarreglar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desautorizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
descaviyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
descorrer/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desempapizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desencordelar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desengodobellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desentollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desfacinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desllucir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desortar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
destiñir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
dexebrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
disparar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
dormir/VtVbVfViVjVkVnVrVt
edificar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embarallar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embirriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embruxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empantasgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empaviscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empetuñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empostellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
encabalgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encandilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encarnizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encernadar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encloyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encoscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
endemoniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enfear/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enfozar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engaramar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engominar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enguapecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enllamazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enmorenar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enredollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enruinzar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entalingar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enterar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entracamundiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entretexer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enverdecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enxendrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enzurronar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbanquiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esberriciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbruyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escacinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escaleyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escantilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escargachar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escascarar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escepar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escolexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escontriñir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escoxalendrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escular/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfalampurniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esforonzar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esgalopiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esgayolar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esguayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esllavar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmantelar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmielar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmucir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espalar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espareyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espaxaretar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esperezar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espingayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espolvar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estallazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estompar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estronar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
eternizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
felicitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
forar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
fundar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
gatiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
gravitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ḥispiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
insultar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llampaniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
malqueriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
matizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mindar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mustiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
nublar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
padriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
patentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pesllar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
plañir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
presentir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVnVrVt
prestixar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
quexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
raspiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
recaer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reembolsar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
relleer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
repercutir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
repetir/VtVcVgViVjVkVnVrVt
resollar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
revender/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
rexir/VtVcVgViVjVkVnVrVt
rocar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
salir/VtVaVkVmVr
simplificar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
solliviar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sovietizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tamburriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tenyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tornar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tresbordar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tronchar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
valtiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
vulcanizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
xoferiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
zarrapicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
